District of Columbia statutes.
10-158

Theodore Roosevelt Island — Maintenance, administration and development.

The island, known as Theodore Roosevelt Island, shall be maintained and administered by the Director of the National Park Service as a natural park for the recreation and enjoyment of the public; provided, that no general plan for the development of the island be adopted without the approval of the Theodore Roosevelt Association; and so long as this Association remains in existence, no development, inconsistent with this plan, be executed without the Association’s consent.

History

May 21, 1932, 47 Stat. 163, ch. 200, § 1
Feb. 11, 1933, 47 Stat. 799, ch. 48, § 1
May 21, 1953, 67 Stat. 27, ch. 63, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-158.
1973 Ed., § 8-164.

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the Director of the National Park Service relating to public buildings were transferred to the Federal Works Administrator by § 303 (b) of Reorganization Plan No. I, July 1, 1939, 4 F.R. 2729, 53 Stat. 1427. All functions of all officers of the Department of the Interior (including the Director of the National Park Service) and all functions of all agencies and employees of such Department were, with 2 exceptions, transferred to the Secretary of the Interior, with power vested in him to authorize their performance or the performance of any of his functions by any of such officers, agencies, and employees, by 1950 Reorganization Plan No. 3, §§ 1, 2, 15 F.R. 3174, 64 Stat. 1262. All functions of the Federal Works Agency and of all agencies thereof, together with all functions of the Federal Works Administrator, and all functions of the Commissioner of Public Buildings and the Public Buildings Administration, were transferred to the Administrator of General Services by § 103(a) of the Act of June 30, 1949, 63 Stat. 380, ch. 288. The Federal Works Agency, the Office of Federal Works Administrator, the Office of Commissioner of Public Buildings, and the Public Buildings Administration, were abolished by § 103(b) of said Act. All functions with respect to acquiring space in buildings by lease and all functions with respect to assigning and reassigning space in buildings for use by agencies (including both space acquired by lease and space in government-owned buildings), were, with certain exceptions, transferred from the respective agencies in which theretofore vested to the Administrator of General Services by §  1 of 1950 Reorganization Plan No. 18, 15 F.R. 3177, 64 Stat. 1270.